Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB34.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 following:(1) Article XVII-B.(2) Article XVII-D.(3) Article XVII-E.(4) Article XVII-G.(5) Article XVII-H.(6) Article XVII-I.(7) Article XVII-J.(8) Article XVII-K.(8.1) Article XVII-L.(9) Article XVIII.(10) Article XVIII-B.(11) Article XVIII-D.(12) Article XVIII-E.(13) Article XVIII-F.(14) Article XVIII-G.(14.1) Article XVIII-H.(15) Article XIX-A.(15.1) Article XIX-C.(16) Article XIX-E.(16.1) Article XIX-F.(16.2) Article XIX-L.(17) Section 2010.(19) Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(20) The act of December 1, 2004 (P.L.1750, No.226), known as the First Class Cities Economic Development District Act.(21) 12 Pa.C.S. Ch. 34 (relating to Infrastructure and Facilities Improvement Program).20250HB0034PN0013 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (22) Any other program established by a law of this Commonwealth in which a person applies for and receives a credit against a tax. This paragraph shall not apply to a credit against a tax liability as a result of an overpayment.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LDISASTER LODGING TAX CREDITSection 1901-L. Scope of article.This article establishes the disaster lodging tax credit program.Section 1902-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Beneficiary." A resident of this Commonwealth whose primary residence located within this Commonwealth was affected by a disaster to whom a qualified hotel or recreational campground provides a discount. The term shall not include a resident of this Commonwealth for whom housing was made available, as a result of a disaster, through a Federal or State disaster relief program."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Disaster." A man-made disaster or natural disaster that represents a direct and immediate threat to the primary residence of a beneficiary, such that the primary residence is rendered uninhabitable or inaccessible."Discount." A discount of not more than 100% on accommodations provided to a beneficiary by a qualified hotel or recreational campground.20250HB0034PN0013 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Man-made disaster." An industrial, nuclear or transportation accident, sinkhole, explosion, conflagration, power failure, natural resource shortage or other condition, except enemy action, resulting from man-made causes, including oil spills and other environmental contamination, which threatens or causes substantial damage to property or individuals, loss of life or other hardships."Natural disaster." A hurricane, tornado, storm, flood, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, earthquake, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, fire, sinkhole, explosion or other catastrophe not resulting from a man-made cause which threatens or causes substantial damage to property or individuals, possible loss of life or other hardships."Qualified hotel." A hotel, as defined in section 209(a)(1.4), that is located in this Commonwealth and that provides a discount."Qualifying tax liability." A tax paid by a qualified hotel."Recreational campground." As follows:(1) A lodging establishment located in this Commonwealth organized to accommodate five or more separate, designated campsites for shelter in either privately owned or campground-owned lodging. The property may:(i) Include amenities, such as site-specific electric and sewer hookups, public bath houses, convenience stores, recreational areas or pools.(ii) Permit seasonal sites.(iii) Not require seasonal guests to have month-to-month agreements.(iv) Allow approved guests to leave a trailer on the site throughout the year but not maintain a permanent 20250HB0034PN0013 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residence.(2) The term does not include a recreational vehicle or tent campsite in a State park."Rent." As defined in section 209(a)(6)."Tax credit." A tax credit under this article.Section 1903-L. Tax credit.(a) Eligibility.--A qualified hotel or recreational campground that provides a discount shall be eligible for a tax credit equal to 100% of the discount provided.(b) Limitation.--A qualified hotel or recreational campground may receive a tax credit for a discount for not more than 90 nights per accommodation rented by a beneficiary.Section 1904-L. Procedure.(a) Application.--(1) A qualified hotel or recreational campground may apply to the department for a tax credit.(2) The application must be submitted to the department by March 31 for the tax credit claimed for a discount provided to a beneficiary during the prior calendar year.(3) The application must be on a form and in the manner determined by the department and must include the following:(i) certification under subsection (b);(ii) information required by the department to verify that the applicant is a qualified hotel or recreational campground; and(iii) any other information as the department deems appropriate.(b) Certification.--A beneficiary must certify, on a form and in the manner determined by the department, that the beneficiary's primary residence was directly and immediately 20250HB0034PN0013 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 threatened by a man-made disaster or natural disaster.(c) Review and approval.--(1) The department shall review each application and shall issue an approval or disapproval by December 31 of each year.(2) Upon approval, the department shall issue a certificate stating the amount of tax credit granted for discounts provided in the prior calendar year.Section 1905-L. Carryover, carry back, refund and assignment of tax credit.(a) Use.--A tax credit shall first be applied against the qualifying tax liability of the qualified hotel or recreational campground during the tax year in which the qualified hotel or recreational campground provided a discount.(b) Carryover.--If the qualified hotel or recreational campground cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit during the taxable year in which the qualified hotel or recreational campground provided a discount, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualifying tax liability of the qualified hotel or recreational campground for those taxable years. Each time that the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, the tax credit shall be reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during the immediately preceding taxable year. The tax credit may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than five taxable years following the first taxable year for which the qualified hotel or recreational campground was entitled to claim the tax credit.(c) Carryback and refund.--A qualified hotel or recreational campground may not carry back nor obtain a refund of an unused 20250HB0034PN0013 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tax credit.(d) Sale or assignment.--A qualified hotel or recreational campground may not sell nor assign a tax credit granted to the qualified hotel or recreational campground.Section 1906-L. Regulations.(a) Promulgation.--The department may promulgate regulations to implement and administer this article. The regulations may provide additional guidance as to what constitutes a disaster.(b) Guidelines.--The department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this article. The guidelines shall be in effect until the department promulgates regulations for the implementation of this article.Section 1907-L. Report.The department shall, by March 31 of the succeeding year, issue a report on the costs of the tax credit to the Governor, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0034PN0013 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920